Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1718
Seller-assisted marketing plan; sale or lease to ongoing business enterprises; excluded.

A seller-assisted marketing plan shall not include a sale or lease to an ongoing business enterprise which also sells or leases equipment, products, or supplies or performs services which are not supplied by the seller and which the purchaser does not utilize with the equipment, products, supplies, or services of the seller.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 18;

Laws 1993, LB 218, § 6.